Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3807
Marketing, defined.

Marketing shall include any and all activities intended to directly or indirectly facilitate the sale, exchange, or other distribution of a product or commodity in an economic, efficient, and profitable manner, including research, market development, publicity, promotion, education, product utilization, and comparable activities.

Laws 1979, LB 538, § 7.